District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Living Donor Protection Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Insurance Trade and Economic Development Amendment Act of 2000,
effective April 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-265; D.C. Official Code § 31-2231.01 et seq.), is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 101 (D.C. Official Code § 31-2231.01) is amended as follows:
(1) New paragraphs (7A) and (7B) are added to read as follows:
“(7A) “Living donor” means an individual who has donated all, or part, of an
organ or tissue and is not deceased.
“(7B) “Organ” means a human eye, kidney, liver, heart, lung, pancreas,
esophagus, stomach, small or large intestine, a portion of the gastrointestinal tract, or another
part of the human body designated by the Commissioner by rule.”.
(2) A new paragraph (8A) is added to read as follows:
“(8A) “Tissue” means a portion of the human body other than an organ, including
skin, bone, bone marrow, a heart valve, a spermatozoon, an ova, an artery, a vein, a tendon, a
ligament, blood, blood derivatives, a pituitary gland, fluid, or another portion of the human body
designated by the Commissioner by rule.”.
(b) Section 111 (D.C. Official Code § 31-2231.11) is amended by adding a new
subsection (c-1) to read as follows:
“(c-1)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this act, no insurer shall deny coverage,
cancel coverage, or refuse to issue, determine the price or premium for, or otherwise vary any
term or condition of a life insurance policy, disability insurance policy, or long-term care
insurance policy for an individual based solely on, and without any actual, unique, and material
actuarial risks related to, the status of the individual as a living donor.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall apply to life insurance policies,
disability insurance policies, and long-term care insurance policies delivered or issued for
delivery after January 1, 2026.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-206(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2